North Carolina, session 2025, SB855.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-51-37(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Independent pharmacy. – A pharmacy that is part of a group has a limited
market of 10 or fewer pharmacies under common ownership, including a
pharmacy that is part of a group of one.states and that meets at least one of the
following criteria:
a. Is non-publicly traded.
b. Has a pharmacy-focused core business objective."
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Insurance the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to support the implementation and enforcement of
the provisions of S.L. 2025-69, also known as The SCRIPT Act.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*S855-v-1*